Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1121
Posting excerpts of law.

Every employer, employment agency, and labor organization subject to the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall post in a conspicuous place or places on his, her, or its premises a notice to be prepared or approved by the commission which shall set forth excerpts of the act and such other relevant information which the commission deems necessary to explain the act.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 21, p. 796;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 16.